Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,290
Violations; penalty; county attorney; duties.

(1) Any person violating any provision of the Nebraska Pure Food Act, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act, or a final order of the director shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law.

(2) It shall be the duty of the county attorney of the county in which any violation of the Nebraska Pure Food Act occurs or is about to occur, when notified of such violation by the department, to cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 40;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.36;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 59.